Maryland, session 2025, HB0261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
8–105.
(a) If the applicable assets of the estate are insufficient to pay all claims in full,
the personal representative shall make payment in the following order:
(1) Fees due to the register;
(2) Costs and expenses of administration;
(3) Funeral expenses as provided in § 8–106 of this subtitle;
(4) Compensation of personal representatives as provided in § 7–601 of this
article, for legal services as provided in § 7–602 of this article, and commissions of licensed
real estate brokers;
(5) Family allowance as provided in § 3–201 of this article;
(6) UNPAID CHILD SUPPORT DUE BY THE DECEDENT;
[(6)] (7) Taxes due by the decedent;
[(7)] (8) Reasonable medical, hospital, and nursing expenses of the last
illness of the decedent;
– 1 –

Ch. 225 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(8)] (9) Rent payable by the decedent for not more than three months in
arrears;
[(9)] (10) Wages, salaries, or commission for services performed for the
decedent within three months prior to death of the decedent;
[(10)] (11) Assistance paid under the Public Assistance to Adults Program,
as provided in § 5–407(d) of the Human Services Article; and
[(11)] (12) All other claims.
(b) (1) A preference may not be given in the payment of a claim over another
claim of the same class.
(2) A claim due and payable is not entitled to a preference over claims not
yet due.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –